Hawaii statutes.
[§346-29.3] Medical assistance
application information; annual report; public disclosure. (a) Each
applicant for medical assistance under any program administered by the
department shall identify the employer of the proposed beneficiary of medical
assistance. If the proposed beneficiary is unemployed, the applicant for
medical assistance shall identify the employer of any adult who is responsible
for providing all or some of the proposed beneficiary's support.

For the purposes of this section, "proposed
beneficiary" means any person who files an application for health care
benefits or hospital care for the person, or any other individual on whose
behalf an application is filed, including children or other dependents of the
applicant.

(b) Before October 1 of each year, the
department shall submit to the legislature a written annual report identifying
all employers identified pursuant to subsection (a) who employ twenty-five or
more beneficiaries of medical assistance programs administered by the department.
In determining whether the twenty-five-employee threshold is met, the
department shall include all beneficiaries employed by the employer and its
subsidiaries at all locations within the State. In the event the department
requires assistance to ascertain information, such as an employer's
subsidiaries or location, the department shall consult with the department of
commerce and consumer affairs. The report shall include:

(1) Each employer's name and names of subsidiaries,
if appropriate, that employ beneficiaries of department medical assistance
programs;

(2) The location of the employer;

(3) For each department medical assistance program,
the total number of the employer's employees and dependents who are enrolled in
the program; and

(4) The total cost to the State per year of providing
medical assistance benefits for the employees and enrolled dependents of each
identified employer.

The report shall not include the name of any
individual medical assistance program beneficiary and shall be subject to
applicable privacy standards established under federal medicaid regulations and
the administrative simplification provisions of the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191.

(c) The department shall make the annual
report available to the public through any means the director deems
appropriate. [L Sp 2005, c 10, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next